Pennsylvania, session 2025-2026, HB722.
hereby enacts as follows:Section 1. Section 1991 of Title 1 of the Pennsylvania Consolidated Statutes is amended by adding a definition to read:§ 1991. Definitions.The following words and phrases, when used in any statute finally enacted on or after September 1, 1937, unless the context clearly indicates otherwise, shall have the meanings given to them in this section:* * *"Cremation." The technical process, using mechanical or thermal process, including alkaline hydrolysis, that reduces human remains to bone fragments. The term includes the processing and pulverization of bone fragments and the placement of the processed remains in a cremated remains container.123456789101112131415161718 * * *Section 2. This act shall take effect in 60 days.20250HB0722PN0743 - 2 - 12